Virginia statutes. Title 44. Military and Emergency Laws.
Chapter 4. Air Raid Precautions.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2B M.J. Aviation, § 1.

§§ 44-147 through 44-151.

Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 221, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §§ 44-147 through 44-151, Air Raid Precautions, derived from 1942, pp. 368, 369; Michie Code 1942, §§ 2673(132)—(136); 1952, c. 359; 1977, c. 326.